Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 2. School Boards.

Collateral references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools, § 59 et seq.

78 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts, §§ 93-171.

Right of school teacher to serve as member of school board in same school district where employed. 70 ALR3d 1188.

Privileged nature of statement or utterances by member of school board in course of official proceedings. 85 ALR3d 1137.

Sec. 14.12.030.
School boards.

Each borough and city school district with an average daily membership of 5,000 or less has a school board of five members, except that the governing body of the borough or city may by ordinance, concurred in by a majority of the district school board, provide for a school board of seven members.

Each borough and city school district with an average daily membership exceeding 5,000 has a school board of seven, nine, or eleven members, as established by ordinance.

The provisions of (a) and (b) of this section do not apply if the assembly serves as the school board of the borough school district.

The provisions of (a) and (b) of this section do not apply to a regional educational attendance area that converts to a city or borough school district. The number of school board members may be changed by the qualified voters in a district by placing the question on the ballot at a regular school board election in the manner prescribed by law.

Each city or borough school district that is operating schools on a military reservation under AS

14.12.020(a)

has one nonvoting delegate from the military reservation or reservations to the school district board to advise and assist the board in matters relating to the military reservation schools operated by the school district and to act as liaison between the board and the military community. The nonvoting delegate shall be appointed by the school district board, shall serve at the pleasure of the school district board, and must be an inhabitant of the area served by the military reservation schools operated by the school district by contract. If an elected community school committee is established on a military reservation, the only inhabitants of that military reservation who are eligible for appointment as the nonvoting delegate are those inhabitants who are members of the elected school committee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 71 SLA 1969; am § 1 ch 83 SLA 1974; am § 2 ch 13 SLA 1975; am § 6 ch 124 SLA 1975; am § 4 ch 24 SLA 1979; am § 3 ch 73 SLA 1985; am § 27 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 21 ch 37 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 86 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (d) was enacted as (e).
Subsection (e) was formerly (d).
Relettered in 1986.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to election of board members, see AS

29.20.300

.

Sec. 14.12.035.
Advisory school boards in borough school districts.

A borough school district board may establish advisory school boards, and by regulation shall prescribe their manner of selection, organization, powers, and duties.

History.

(§ 1 ch 81 SLA 1974)

Sec. 14.12.040.
Transition from five to seven member board.

The transition from a five-member to a seven-member school board shall be made at the regular election following, or being held within 90 days preceding, the completion of the second regular school term during which the district maintains an average daily membership exceeding 5,000 or at the regular election following the effective date of an ordinance increasing board membership as provided in AS

14.12.030(a)

. Once the district has a seven-member school board, the number of members may not be changed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 71 SLA 1969)

Sec. 14.12.050.
School board terms.

The term of office of a member of a borough or city school board is three years and until a successor takes office. However, the members of a newly created five-member school board hold office for initial terms as follows: two for a term of three years, two for a term of two years, and one for a term of one year, the terms being assigned to the members by lot. The members of a newly created seven-member school board hold office for initial terms as follows: three for a term of three years, two for a term of two years, and two for a term of one year, the terms being assigned to the members by lot.

When a transition is made from a five-member school board to a seven-member school board, the length of the terms of office for the two new members to be elected shall be determined by lot so that when the terms of office for the two new members are assigned, the terms of office for the entire seven-member board shall be as follows: three members have a three-year term, two members have a two-year term, and two members have a one-year term. A seven-member school board, the terms of office of whose members at the time of transition from a five-member board did not result in terms expiring in the manner provided in this section, may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the board, adjust the terms of office to conform to the schedule for expiration of terms of office provided in this section.

Nothing in this section prevents school board members from succeeding themselves.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 41 SLA 1972)

Sec. 14.12.070.
Vacancies.

If a vacancy occurs on the school board, the remaining members shall within 30 days fill the vacancy.
The person selected shall serve until the next regular election when a successor shall be elected to serve the balance of the term.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Sec. 14.12.080.
Qualification of members.

To be eligible to be a member of a school board, a person must have the same qualifications as are necessary to be a municipal voter in the school district.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Sec. 14.12.090.
Oath.

School board members, before taking office, shall take and sign the following oath or affirmation: “I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support and defend the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the State of Alaska and that I will honestly, faithfully, and impartially discharge my duties as a school board member to the best of my ability.”

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Sec. 14.12.100.
Application.

AS

14.12.010

—

14.12.100

apply to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1968 the word “may” was deleted before the word “apply” to correct a manifest error in the original publication of this section.

Sec. 14.12.110.
Single body as assembly and school board.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter or other law, a single body may serve as both the assembly and school board in the manner provided for third class boroughs under AS

29.20.300(b)

, if

an ordinance for that purpose is approved by the assembly and ratified by a referendum of a majority of the qualified borough voters voting on the question at a regular or special election; and

the public school population within the borough is 500 pupils or less.

History.

(§ 1 ch 214 SLA 1970; am § 28 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 14.12.115.
Indemnification.

A school board shall insure or indemnify and protect the board, any member of the board, or any agent, employee, teacher, student teacher, officer, or member of the supervisory or administrative staff of the school district against financial loss and expense, including reasonable legal fees and costs arising out of any claim, demand, suit, or judgment by reason of alleged negligence, alleged violation of civil rights, or alleged wrongful act resulting in death or bodily injury to any person or accidental damage to or destruction of property, inside or outside the school premises, if the board member, agent, employee, teacher, student teacher, officer, or member of the supervisory or administrative staff, at the time of the occurrence, was acting under the direction of the school board within the course or scope of the duties of the board member, agent, employee, teacher, student teacher, officer, or member of the supervisory or administrative staff.

History.

(§ 2 ch 148 SLA 1978)

Opinions of attorney general. —

It is improper for a school district to hire a professional employee as a consultant solely to mitigate the effects of a certificate suspension or revocation. Sept. 14, 1988 Op. Att’y Gen.

A school district may agree to defend a professional employee in an ethics proceeding before the Professional Teaching Practices Commission if it determines that, in carrying out the action upon which the complaint is based, the employee was acting in furtherance of and within the scope of his or her employment. Sept. 14, 1988 Op. Att’y Gen.

Collateral references. —

Waiver of, or estoppel to assert, failure to give required notice of claim of injury to school district or authorities. 65 ALR2d 1278.

Tort liability of public schools. 86 ALR2d 489; 33 ALR3d 703; 34 ALR3d 1166; 35 ALR3d 725; 35 ALR3d 758; 36 ALR3d 361; 37 ALR3d 712; 37 ALR3d 738; 38 ALR3d 830; 23 ALR5th 1.

Modern status of doctrine of sovereign immunity as applied to public schools and institutions of higher learning. 33 ALR3d 703.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for accidents due to condition of buildings or equipment. 34 ALR3d 1166.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for injuries due to condition of grounds, walks, and playgrounds. 37 ALR3d 738.

Immunity of private schools and institutions of higher learning from liability in tort. 38 ALR3d 480.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for educational malpractice. 1 ALR4th 1139.

Sec. 14.12.120.
Limited liability. [Repealed, § 4 ch 148 SLA 1978.]